Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Professional Engineering

§ 1171.
Board of Professional Engineering.

The Board of Professional Engineering is created, consisting of six members who are residents of this State. The Board shall be attached to the Office of Professional Regulation.

One member of the Board shall be a member of the public who has no financial interest in engineering other than as a consumer or possible consumer of its services. The member shall have no financial interest personally or through a spouse.

Five members of the Board shall be licensed professional engineers:

Membership under this subsection shall include one civil engineer, one mechanical engineer, one structural engineer, one electrical engineer, and one engineer from among all specialty disciplines licensed by the Board.

Membership under this subsection shall include at least three engineers in private practice.

Of the five professional members appointed under this subsection, at the time of appointment, three persons shall have been engaged in the practice of professional engineering for at least 12 years.

Board members shall be appointed by the Governor in accordance with

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004. The Governor shall request nominations from the various State engineering societies and may request nominations from other sources, but shall not be bound to select members from among the persons nominated.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2005, No. 27

, § 37;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2007, No. 29

, § 22;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2013, No. 27

, § 7.

§ 1172.
Powers and duties.

The Board shall adopt rules necessary for the performance of its duties, including:

a list of recognized engineering specialty disciplines;

qualifications for obtaining licensure, interpreting sections 1182a and 1182b of this chapter;

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given to licensees, applicants, and the public; and

procedures for disciplinary and reinstatement cases.

The Board shall:

offer examinations to qualified applicants for licensing;

use administrative services provided by the Office of Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5;

investigate suspected unprofessional conduct; and

have general responsibility for ensuring that professional engineering services available in this State are of uniformly good quality and take suitable action, within the scope of its powers, to solve or bring public and professional attention to any problem which it finds in this area.

The Board may:

establish or approve continuing education programs or other methods of allowing licensees to maintain continued competency;

conduct hearings;

administer oaths and at the request of any party issue subpoenas;

issue orders relating to discovery in the same manner as a judge under the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, which may be enforced under

3 V.S.A. § 809b

;

adopt rules relating to the procedures to be followed in hearings held under this chapter;

receive assistance from and refer suspected unauthorized practice to the Attorney General; and

request the Attorney General to obtain injunctions to restrain unprofessional conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1999, No. 52

, § 11;

2013, No. 27

, § 8.

§§ 1173-1175.
Repealed. 2013, No. 27, § 16.

§ 1176.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application for engineering license or application to add additional specialty discipline $ 100.00

Application for engineer intern certificate $ 50.00

Biennial license renewal $ 150.00

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 59

, § 53, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 175;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2007, No. 29

, § 23;

2009, No. 47

, § 9;

2013, No. 27

, § 9;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2019, No. 70

, § 16.